Massachusetts, session 194th, H4249.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 46 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
1, as amended by section 1 of chapter 166 of the acts of 2024, and inserting in place thereof the
following section:-
Section 1. Each local clerk shall obtain and record the following facts set forth in this
section, as well as such additional information that may be required under federal statutes or
contracts, regulations promulgated pursuant to section 4 of chapter 17 or as the commissioner of
public health may require, relative to births, marriages, acknowledgments and adjudications of
parentage and deaths which occurred in the town or city and for certificates of marriage issued
by the town or city:
of 2

In the record of births, the date of birth, place of birth, the name, residence and sex of
child and the names, names at birth or adoption, places of birth and dates of birth of the parent or
parents;
In the record of birth of a child born to parents not married to each other, the name of and
other facts relating to the other parent or parents shall not be recorded except as provided in
section 2 of chapter 209C where parentage has been acknowledged or adjudicated under the laws
of the commonwealth or under the laws of any other jurisdiction;
In the record of marriages, date of record, date and place of marriage, name, residence
and official station of the person by whom solemnized; for each of the parties to be married the
name, date and place of birth, residence, age, number of the marriage and if previously married,
whether widowed or divorced and the name at birth or adoption of the parties’ parents;
In the record of death, date of death, name of deceased, including surname at birth or
adoption, gender, race, marital status, education, name of spouse if ever married, supposed age,
residence, occupation, place of death, place of birth, surname at birth or adoption and places of
birth of the deceased’s parent or parents, disease or cause of death, defined so that it can be
classified under the international classification of causes of death, and place and type of
immediate disposition. The record of death shall not include the social security number of the
deceased. As used in this section, the word “residence” shall include the name of the street and
number, if any, of the house.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect as of July 1, 2025.
of 2